Hawaii, session 2025, SB772.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that education is the bedrock of a healthy democracy.  To advance the fundamental democratic principles of equality, liberty, and justice for all, a quality school system must deliver instruction that is historically and scientifically accurate and free from discrimination. The legislature further finds that disinformation, misinformation, digital discrimination, and online hate speech are pervasive threats to modern society. In a June 2019 report entitled, "Hate Speech on Social Media:  Global Comparisons", the Council on Foreign Relations noted that digital hate speech has been linked to a global increase in violence toward minorities and that policies used to curb hate speech are often inconsistently enforced by social media companies.  Additionally, disinformation and online hate speech have been linked to outbursts of violence in the real world, including mass shootings at a church in Charleston, South Carolina, and a synagogue in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, as well as the insurrection that occurred at the United States Capitol on January 6, 2021. Moreover, according to a Kaiser Family Foundation coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19) vaccine monitor report published in November 2021, more than seventy-eight per cent of adults in the United States believed or were unsure about at least one of eight false statements about the COVID-19 pandemic or COVID-19 vaccines. The purpose of this Act is to advance informed digital citizenship in Hawaii's public education system by empowering school complexes to incorporate media literacy into standards-based curriculum as appropriate, including content that prevents the negative impacts of misinformation, disinformation, digital discrimination, and online hate speech. SECTION 2.  Section 302A-321, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§302A-321[]]  Standards-based curriculum.  (a) When developing a standards-based curriculum and implementing it in a school or complex, at the minimum, the curriculum shall: (1)  Be specific in its standards-based scope and sequence over a school year for each grade level and course; (2)  Be consistent in course content; (3)  Be aligned across all grade levels; (4)  Specifically address the state content and performance standards and related benchmark maps; and (5)  Be implemented in all appropriate classrooms in the school or complex. (b)  School complexes may choose to develop an articulated and aligned K-12 standards-based curriculum in one or more of the following core content areas: (1)  Language arts; (2)  Mathematics; (3)  Science; and (4)  Social studies. (c)  School complexes shall provide professional development. (d)  School complexes that develop a standards-based curriculum shall use standards-based formative assessment tools to monitor student progress, not less than on a quarterly basis throughout the school year. (e)  School complexes shall develop rigorous classroom-based performance assessments. (f)  School complexes may implement software programs at the school level to help to align school course material with Hawaii content and performance and federal educational standards. (g)  School complexes may incorporate media literacy into standards-based curriculum as appropriate, including content that prevents the negative impacts of misinformation, disinformation, digital discrimination, and online hate speech." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________